Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.123

Registration electronically.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5077.SL) ***

(1) A person qualified to vote who has a valid:

(a) Washington state driver's license;

(b) Washington state identification card;

(c) Washington state learner's permit;

(d) Current Washington tribal identification; or

(e) Social security number,

may submit a voter registration application electronically on the secretary of state's website, and provide either the state issued identification number, the tribal identification number, or the last four digits of the person's social security number.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application and confirm the applicant's United States citizenship by reviewing the registration oath online and affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) For applicants using Washington state issued identification, the applicant must affirmatively assent to use of the applicant's driver's license or state identification card signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) For applicants who are not using Washington state issued identification, the applicant must submit a signature image by either submitting a signature image to the secretary of state, or submitting a signature image as part of the confirmation notice process.

(5) A voter registration application submitted electronically is otherwise considered a registration by mail.

(6) For each electronic application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or state identification card signature from the department of licensing, the voter, or tribal identification issuing authority.

(7) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter registration applications submitted electronically.

[ 2023 c 363 s 1; 2019 c 6 s 3; 2007 c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 363: "This act takes effect July 15, 2024." [ 2023 c 363 s 2.]

Effective date—2007 c 157: "This act takes effect January 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 157 s 2.]